Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.160

Choice of law clauses.

When there is a choice of law clause contained in a governing instrument in which a state trust company is a party, the choice of law of any state agreed to by the parties to such instrument shall control the interpretation and enforcement of the trust or custodial agreement comprising such instrument.

[ 2014 c 37 s 318.]